nl: Type lettertype: Decoratief; Display; Handgeschreven; Pictogram; Monospace; Schreefloos; Script; Schreef; Slab serif; Andere
da: Skrifttype: Dekorativ; Display; Håndskrevet; Ikon; Monospaced; Sans serif; Script; Serif; Slab serif; Andet
sv: Typsnitt: Dekorativ; Display; Handskriven; Ikon; Icke-proportionell; Sans serif; Script; Serif; Slab serif; Övrigt
sl-SI: Slog pisave: Dekorativen; Display; Ročna pisava; Ikona; Enakokoračna; Sans serif; Script; Serif; Slab serif; Drugo
th: รูปแบบตัวอักษร: ตกแต่ง; สำหรับพาดหัว; แบบลายมือเขียน; ไอคอน; ตัวอักษรมีความกว้างเท่ากัน; ไม่มีขีดที่ปลายอักษร; แบบปลายหวัด; มีขีดที่ปลายอักษร; Slab serif; อื่นๆ
cs: Styl písma: Dekorativní; Displej; Ručně psané; Ikona; Se stejnou roztečí; Bez patky; Skript; S patkou; Slab serif; Jiné
es: Estilo de fuente: Decorativo; De exhibición; Escrito a mano; Icono; Monoespaciado; Sans serif; Script; Serif; Slab serif; Otros
pt-BR: Estilo de fonte: Decorativo; Exibição; Escrita à mão; Ícone; Monoespaçado; Sans serif; Script; Serif; Egyptienne; Outro
ro-RO: Stil font: Decorativ; Afișare; Scris de mână; Pictogramă; Monospațiat; Sans serif; Script; Serif; Slab serif; Altele
tr: Yazı tipi stili: Dekoratif; Ekran; El yazısı; İkon; Tek aralıklı; Sans aerif; Senaryo; Serif; Slab serif; Diğer
it: Tipo di font: Decorativo; Display; Scritto a mano; Icona; Monospaziato; Sans serif; Script; Serif; Serif lastra; Altro
lt-LT: Šrifto stilius: Puošnus; Pristatymui; Rašyta ranka; Piktograma; Fiksuoto pločio; Neserifinis; Rašmenys; Serifinis; Plokščiasis serifinis; Kita
pt-PT: Estilo de tipo de letra: Decorativo; Exposição; Escrito à mão; Ícone; Monoespaçado; Sem serifa; Escrita; Serifa; Slab serif; Outro
zh-CN: 字体样式: 装饰性; 显示; 手写; 图标; 等宽; 无衬线字体; 脚本; 衬线; Slab serif; 其他
ru: Стиль шрифта: Декоративный; Дисплей; Рукописный; Значок; Моноширинный; Шрифт без засечек; Рукописный; С засечками; Прямоугольный сериф; Другой
el: Στυλ γραμματοσειράς: Διακοσμητικό; Display; Handwritten; Icon; Monospaced; Sans serif; Script; Serif; Slab serif; Άλλο
hr-HR: Stil fonta: Ukrasni; Izložbeni; Rukopis; Ikona; Nerazmjerni; Sans serif; Script; Serif; Slab serif; Ostalo
nb: Skrifttypestil: Dekorativ; Skjerm; Håndskrevet; Ikon; Fastbreddeskrift; Sans serif; Manus; Serif; Slab serif; Annet
fr: Style de police: Décoratif; Affichage; Manuscrit; Icône; Chasse fixe; Sans Serif; Script; Serif; Slab serif; Autre
zh-TW: 字型樣式: 裝飾; 顯示; 手寫; 圖示; 等寬; 無襯線體; 腳本; 襯線; 粗襯線體; 其他
ko: 글꼴 스타일: 장식적인; 디스플레이; 손글씨; 아이콘; 고정폭; 산세리프; 필기체; 세리프; Slab serif; 기타
pl: Styl czcionki: Dekoracyjny; Monitor; Odręczny; Ikona; Monospaced; Sans serif; Skrypt; Serif; Płyta szeryfowa; Inne
en: Font style: Decorative; Display; Handwritten; Icon; Monospaced; Sans serif; Script; Serif; Slab serif; Other
fi: Fonttityyli: Koristeellinen; Näyttö; Käsinkirjoitettu; Kuvake; Yksivälinen; Sans serif; Käsikirjoitus; Serif; Slab serif; Muu
bg-BG: Стил на шрифта: Декоративен; Дисплей; Ръкописен текст; Икона; С един интервал; Sans serif; Скрипт; Serif; Slab serif; Други
sk-SK: Štýl písma: Dekoratívny; Akcidenčný; Ručne písaný; Ikonický; Neproporcionálny; Bezpätkový; Skriptový; Pätkový; Egyptienka; Iné
de: Stil der Schriftart: Dekorativ; Anzeige; Handschriftlich; Symbol; Monospaced; Sans serif; Skript; Serif; Slab serif; Sonstiges
vi: Kiểu phông chữ: Trang trí; Hiển thị; Viết tay; Biểu tượng; Đơn cách; Sans Serif; Script; Serif; Slab serif; Khác
ja: フォントスタイル: 装飾; ディスプレイ; 手書き; アイコン; 等幅; サンセリフ; スクリプト; セリフ体; スラブセリフ体; その他
hu: Betűstílus: Díszítő; Megjelenítési; Kézírás; Ikon; Azonos szélességű; Sans serif; Script; Serif; Slab serif; Egyéb